Idaho, session 2026, H0721.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-4113, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4113. PLAN REVIEWS -- MAXIMUM FEES AND SCHOOL INSPECTIONS. (1) The
administrator shall establish a program for plan reviews and permit issuance
entirely within the division of occupational and professional licenses.
Plan reviews shall be for the provisions of this chapter and chapter 10, ti-
tle 54, Idaho Code, chapter 26, title 54, Idaho Code, chapter 50, title 54,
Idaho Code, and chapter 86, title 39, Idaho Code, pertaining to construc-
tion, alteration or repair of buildings or structures within the scope of
the division's jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter. Plans for schools
reviewed by the division shall not include a review for compliance with the
provisions of chapter 2, title 41, Idaho Code, or for local planning and
zoning requirements.
(2) The local government or division performing a building plan review
for public works, as defined in section 67-5710B, Idaho Code, shall complete
the initial plan review within thirty (30) calendar days of submission of
such plan.
(2) (3) Plan review fees shall be established by rules promulgated by
the board. Local governments elected by school districts to perform build-
ing plan reviews for public schools as provided for in this section shall
not charge a fee for such review of building plans in excess of what the di-
vision has established by rule for building plan review services for public
schools.
(3) (4) Each manufacturer of commercial coaches and modular buildings
shall submit the building plans for every model of such structure to the ad-
ministrator for the purpose of review.
(4)(a) (5)(a) Public school building plans shall be approved by either
the local government or the division of occupational and professional
licenses, whichever the school district elects. Any city or county that
has adopted by ordinance all the applicable codes pursuant to section
39-4109, Idaho Code, and the codes as permitted in chapter 10, title 54,
Idaho Code, chapter 26, title 54, Idaho Code, and chapter 50, title 54,
Idaho Code, shall be eligible to perform school plan reviews only if the
following additional requirements are met: plans examiners performing
building and energy code plan reviews shall hold current certification


as a commercial building plans examiner by the International Code Coun-
cil; examiners performing plumbing code plan reviews shall hold current
certification as a plumbing inspector by the international associa-
tion of plumbing and mechanical officials and shall be a licensed Idaho
journeyman plumber; examiners performing electrical code plan reviews
shall hold current certification as an electrical inspector by the
national certification program for construction code inspectors and
shall be a licensed Idaho journeyman electrician; and examiners per-
forming mechanical code plan reviews shall hold current certification
as a commercial mechanical inspector by the International Code Council.
(b) All plans examiners who perform public school plan reviews shall be
either an employee of the division, an employee of the local jurisdic-
tion in which the school is to be constructed, or performing plan re-
views under an interagency contract between local jurisdictions, and
shall meet the eligibility requirements as provided in paragraph (a) of
this subsection.
(c) An eligible local government may contract with the division for re-
view of any portion of the plans for which the local government does not
have a properly certified plans examiner. A county may be deemed eli-
gible to perform plan review services only for those types of installa-
tions for which they have authority pursuant to this chapter and chap-
ter 50, title 54, Idaho Code, to adopt an enforcement program. Where
an eligible county performs the plan review services, the electrical
and plumbing code plan reviews shall be performed by the division at the
hourly rate as established in rule by the division. Any local govern-
ment elected to perform plan review services for public schools shall
provide the division a copy of all approved plans.
(d) Wherein the proposed work is valued in excess of one hundred thou-
sand dollars ($100,000), a school district may elect to utilize the
school plan review services available from an eligible local government
building code enforcement jurisdiction or from the division. Wherein
the proposed work is valued at one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
or less, a school district may elect to use a local government without
regard to the eligibility requirements in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section. Election by a school district shall be made by submitting a
written certification to both the division and the involved local gov-
ernment.
(e) Public school plan review services provided by either the divi-
sion or an eligible local jurisdiction pursuant to this section shall
include a review of the following disciplines: building (structural
and nonstructural), mechanical, fuel gas, plumbing, electrical, acces-
sibility, elevators, boilers, and energy conservation. At a minimum,
plan review services shall include:
(i) A technical examination of all drawings and construction doc-
uments;
(ii) The approval of such drawings and construction documents
by determining whether such are in accord with the codes adopted
pursuant to sections 39-4109, 54-1001, 54-2601 and 54-5001, Idaho
Code;


(iii) A determination that the drawings and construction docu-
ments are in compliance, or noncompliance, with the applicable
codes, code interpretation, and the identification of approved
modifications or alternative materials, design or methods; and
(iv) The identification of the reviewing official(s), the date
upon which plans are approved, and a stamp or some other similar
mark on the plans evidencing approval.
(f) If a school district elects to utilize the plan review services
of the division, it shall submit to the division of occupational and
professional licenses three (3) sets of working drawings and specifi-
cations for new public school buildings or facilities and additions or
alterations to existing facilities. The division will review the plans
submitted to it pursuant to this section for compliance with the current
editions of the codes specified in this chapter or within rules pro-
mulgated pursuant to this chapter by the board and by section 39-8006,
Idaho Code.
(5) (6) Public school building plans must shall be approved by either
the local government or the division before the school district may adver-
tise for bids. The jurisdiction performing the public school building plan
review shall complete the initial plan review within thirty (30) calendar
days of submission of such plan. Once plans are reviewed and approved pur-
suant to this section, no material change can shall be made to such plans
without review and approval of such change by the jurisdiction performing
the plan review. All school construction or remodeling governed by this
chapter shall be inspected by building inspectors certified in accordance
with section 39-4108, Idaho Code, or by Idaho-licensed architects or engi-
neers to determine compliance with this chapter and the Idaho uniform school
building safety act, chapter 80, title 39, Idaho Code. Nothing in this
section shall limit the authority of local governments to issue building
permits, perform fire code or other zoning and land use-related plan reviews
or provide a full range of building code enforcement activities as they
relate to inspections of school buildings or facilities sited within their
jurisdiction regardless of the election exercised by the school district
pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-8007, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-8007. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE ADMINISTRATOR. (1) The administra-
tor shall enforce the provisions of this chapter in cooperation with the su-
perintendent of public instruction and the building code advisory board.
(2) The administrator shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter. Such rules shall be promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(3) The administrator shall establish a program for the timely review
of public school construction plans as required by section 39-4113(4)(f)
(5)(f), Idaho Code.
(4) Upon request, the administrator shall provide training to school
districts on the Idaho uniform school building safety code.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.